Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3506
Employee acts prohibited.

An employee shall not download or transfer an employer's private proprietary information or private financial data to a personal Internet account without authorization from the employer. This section shall not apply if the proprietary information or the financial data is otherwise disclosed by the employer to the public pursuant to other provisions of law or practice.

Laws 2016, LB821, § 6.